Georgia, session 2025_26, HB384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
abuse of governmental office, is amended by revising Code Section 16-10-1, relating to
violation of oath by public officer, as follows:
"16-10-1.
(a) Any public officer who willfully and intentionally violates the terms of his or her oath
as prescribed by law shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by imprisonment for not
less than one nor more than five years.
H. B. 384 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 56 0363S
(b) Any peace officer, as such term is defined in Code Section 35-8-2, who has sworn the
oath or oaths prescribed in Code Sections 15-16-4 and 45-3-7 shall be subject to
prosecution under this Code section only for violations of such oath or oaths as prescribed.
(c) No individual shall be subject to prosecution for violation of his or her oath of office
under this Code section, except where such violation is predicated upon the commission
of a felony or a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature."
SECTION 2.
Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 45 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
official oaths, is amended by revising Code Section 45-3-7, relating to oaths of deputies, as
follows:
"45-3-7.
(a) Before proceeding to act, all deputies shall take the same oaths as their principals take
and the oaths shall be filed and entered on the minutes of the same office with the same
endorsement thereon; but this Code section shall not apply to any deputy who may be
employed in particular cases only. A deputy sheriff may take his or her oaths before the
sheriff and the oaths may be filed in and entered in the records of the sheriff's office.
(b) All peace officers, as such term is defined in Code Section 35-8-2, taking their oath of
office on or after July 1, 2025, shall be administered the following oath:
'I, (name of person taking oath), hereby swear or affirm that I will faithfully, fairly,
and without malice or partiality uphold the laws of the State of Georgia, as well as
any ordinances which I am authorized to enforce, to the best of my ability and support
and defend the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Georgia. So
help me God.'
(c) A peace officer may take his or her oath before the chief executive officer of the
agency or any authorized judicial official, and such oath may be filed in and entered in the
records of that agency.
H. B. 384 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 56 0363S
(d) An agency may administer additional oaths that contain provisions not specifically
prescribed and enumerated in this Code section; provided, however, that such oaths, and
any language in addition to the language set forth in this Code section, shall be deemed
aspirational only and of no legal effect in any civil or criminal proceeding.
(e) Sheriffs and their sworn deputies taking their oath of office on or after July 1, 2025,
shall take the oath set forth in Code Section 15-16-4; provided, however, that any language
in such oath in addition to the language set forth in such Code section shall be deemed
aspirational only and of no legal effect in any civil or criminal proceeding."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 384 (SUB)
- 3 -